Washington statutes.
RCW 19.95.030

Deceptive solicitation prohibited.

No person may solicit using any statement or representation with regard to the costs, financing, terms, or conditions of purchase or installation of residential or commercial solar energy systems that is deceptive.

[ 2024 c 349 s 4.]